West Virginia, session 2026, SB388.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9I. DISTRIBUTION OF AITKEN BIBLE. §18-9I-1. Distribution of the Aitken Bible in public schools. (a) A public elementary or secondary school shall, subject to §18-9I-1(b), make the Aitken Bible available to all fourth grade, eighth grade, and 10th grade social studies classrooms.(b) A public elementary or secondary school may accept and use private donations for the purposes of meeting the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. No public funds may be used for this purpose. (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of code to the contrary, this section applies to public charter schools authorized pursuant to §18-5G-1 et seq. of this code.